Massachusetts, session 194th, H4846.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding chapter 32 of the General Laws or any general or special
law to the contrary, Nicholas Anzuoni, chief of the Colrain fire department, may continue to
serve in such position until they reach the age of 70, the date of their retirement, whichever
occurs first; provided, however, that they remain physically and mentally capable of performing
the duties of the position; provided further, that Nicholas Anzuoni may require, at the expense of
the town of Colrain, be examined by an impartial physician designated by the town to determine
such capability. This act shall not entitle Nicholas Anzuoni to remain in service to the town of
Colrain if otherwise removed or suspended in accordance with applicable laws, rules, and
regulations.
SECTION 2. No deductions shall be made from the regular compensation of Nicholas
Anzuoni pursuant to chapter 32 of the General Laws for any service performed subsequent to his
of 2

reaching the age of 65. Upon his retirement they shall receive a superannuation retirement
allowance equal to that which they would have been entitled had they retired upon reaching the
age of 65, if any.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2